Louisiana, session 2026, HB226.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Article 1467(A) is hereby amended and
reenacted and Code of Civil Procedure Article 1467(C) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 1467. Requests for admission; answers and objections
A. Each matter of which an admission is requested shall be separately set
forth. The matter is admitted unless, within thirty days after service of the request,
or within such shorter or longer time as the court may allow, the party to whom the
request is directed serves upon the party requesting the admission a written answer
or objection addressed to the matter, signed by the party or by his attorney. The
written answer or reasons for objection to each request for admission shall
immediately follow a restatement of the request for admission to which the answer
or objection is responding. If objection is made, the reasons therefor shall be stated.
The answer shall specifically deny the matter or set forth in detail the reasons why
the answering party cannot truthfully admit or deny the matter. A denial shall fairly
meet the substance of the requested admission, and when good faith requires that a
party qualify his answer or deny only a part of the matter of which an admission is
requested, he shall specify so much of it as is true and qualify or deny the remainder.
An answering party may not give lack of information or knowledge as a reason for
failure to admit or deny unless he states that he has made reasonable inquiry and that
the information known or readily obtainable by him is insufficient to enable him to
admit or deny. A party who considers that a matter of which an admission has been
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 226 ENROLLED
requested presents a genuine issue for trial may not, on that ground alone, object to
the request; however, he may, subject to the provisions of Article 1472, deny the
matter or set forth reasons why he cannot admit or deny it.
* * *
C. Except for a default judgment, there shall be a "Rule 10.1 Certificate of
Conference" issued in accordance with Rule 10.1 under Title II of the Rules for Civil
Proceedings in District Courts of the Rules for Louisiana District Courts and Juvenile
Courts and Louisiana Family Law Proceedings before the court orders that a request
for admission is deemed admitted.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.